Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-1266
Nebraska Investment Council; adopt rules and regulations.

The Nebraska Investment Council shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to establish procedures for the distribution of funds to banks, capital stock financial institutions, and qualifying mutual financial institutions.

Laws 1978, LB 258, § 6;

Laws 2002, LB 957, § 28;

Laws 2003, LB 175, § 7.